New Jersey, session 222, A5183.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A school district in developing, adopting, and implementing policies and procedures regarding attendance of students at school shall define an excused absence from school to include an absence for an illness of the student, provided that the parent or guardian of the student submits supporting documentation to the school district upon the students return to school in accordance with subsection b. of this section. b.  The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, shall develop guidelines on defining an excused absence from school for a students illness. The guidelines shall include the supporting documentation that may be required by the school district upon the students return to school after an absence for an illness for the absence to be considered an excused absence. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the first full school year next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Education may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.